output.aff
SFX R Y 399
SFX R   rat         riem       [aeiou]rat
SFX R   rat         ries       [aeiou]rat
SFX R   rat         rie        [aeiou]rat
SFX R   rat         rieme      [aeiou]rat
SFX R   rat         riete      [aeiou]rat
SFX R   rat         ru         [aeiou]rat
SFX R   rat         ruc        [aeiou]rat
SFX R   rat         r          [aeiou]rat
SFX R   rat         rme        [aeiou]rat
SFX R   rat         rte        [aeiou]rat
SFX R   rat         eriem      [^aeiou]rat
SFX R   rat         eries      [^aeiou]rat
SFX R   rat         erie       [^aeiou]rat
SFX R   rat         erieme     [^aeiou]rat
SFX R   rat         eriete     [^aeiou]rat
SFX R   rat         eru        [^aeiou]rat
SFX R   rat         eruc       [^aeiou]rat
SFX R   rat         er         [^aeiou]rat
SFX R   rat         erme       [^aeiou]rat
SFX R   rat         erte       [^aeiou]rat
SFX R   dat         dim        dat
SFX R   dat         dis        dat
SFX R   dat         di         dat
SFX R   dat         dime       dat
SFX R   dat         dite       dat
SFX R   dat         dia        dat
SFX R   dat         diac       dat
SFX R   dat         di         dat
SFX R   dat         dime       dat
SFX R   dat         dite       dat
SFX R   nat         nim        nat
SFX R   nat         nis        nat
SFX R   nat         ni         nat
SFX R   nat         nime       nat
SFX R   nat         nite       nat
SFX R   nat         nia        nat
SFX R   nat         niac       nat
SFX R   nat         n          nat
SFX R   nat         nme        nat
SFX R   nat         nte        nat
SFX R   tat         tim        tat
SFX R   tat         tis        tat
SFX R   tat         ti         tat
SFX R   tat         time       tat
SFX R   tat         tite       tat
SFX R   tat         tia        tat
SFX R   tat         tiac       tat
SFX R   tat         ti         tat
SFX R   tat         time       tat
SFX R   tat         tite       tat
SFX R   at          im         [^dnrt]at
SFX R   at          is         [^dnrt]at
SFX R   at          i          [^dnrt]at
SFX R   at          ime        [^dnrt]at
SFX R   at          ite        [^dnrt]at
SFX R   at          ia         [^dnrt]at
SFX R   at          iac        [^dnrt]at
SFX R   zat         z          zat
SFX R   at          me         [^dnrt]at
SFX R   at          te         [^dnrt]at
SFX R   at          al         at
SFX R   at          ala        at
SFX R   at          alo        at
SFX R   at          ali        at
SFX R   iect        eciem      iect
SFX R   iect        ecies      iect
SFX R   iect        ecie       iect
SFX R   iect        ecieme     iect
SFX R   iect        eciete     iect
SFX R   iect        ecu        iect
SFX R   iect        ecuc       iect
SFX R   iect        ec         iect
SFX R   iect        ecme       iect
SFX R   iect        ecte       iect
SFX R   ct          kol        iect
SFX R   ct          kla        iect
SFX R   ct          klo        iect
SFX R   ct          kli        iect
SFX R   lct         lciem      lct
SFX R   lct         lcies      lct
SFX R   lct         lcie       lct
SFX R   lct         lcieme     lct
SFX R   lct         lciete     lct
SFX R   lct         lcu        lct
SFX R   lct         lcuc       lct
SFX R   lct         lc         lct
SFX R   lct         lcme       lct
SFX R   lct         lcte       lct
SFX R   ct          kol        lct
SFX R   ct          kla        lct
SFX R   ct          klo        lct
SFX R   ct          kli        lct
SFX R   ct          zem        oct
SFX R   ct          zes        oct
SFX R   ct          ze         oct
SFX R   ct          zme        oct
SFX R   ct          zeme       oct
SFX R   ct          zte        oct
SFX R   ct          zete       oct
SFX R   ct          zu         oct
SFX R   oct         ohol       oct
SFX R   oct         ohla       oct
SFX R   oct         ohlo       oct
SFX R   oct         ohli       oct
SFX R   ediet       iem        ediet
SFX R   ediet       ies        ediet
SFX R   ediet       ie         ediet
SFX R   ediet       ieme       ediet
SFX R   ediet       iete       ediet
SFX R   ediet       edia       ediet
SFX R   ediet       ediac      ediet
SFX R   ediet       edz        ediet
SFX R   ediet       edzme      ediet
SFX R   ediet       edzte      ediet
SFX R   ediet       edel       ediet
SFX R   ediet       edela      ediet
SFX R   ediet       edelo      ediet
SFX R   ediet       edeli      ediet
SFX R   liet        eliem      mliet
SFX R   liet        elies      mliet
SFX R   liet        elie       mliet
SFX R   liet        elieme     mliet
SFX R   liet        eliete     mliet
SFX R   liet        elu        mliet
SFX R   liet        eluc       mliet
SFX R   liet        el         mliet
SFX R   liet        elme       mliet
SFX R   liet        elte       mliet
SFX R   iet         i          [^m]liet
SFX R   iet         ime        [^m]liet
SFX R   iet         ite        [^m]liet
SFX R   iet         me         [^dlnt]iet
SFX R   iet         te         [^dlnt]iet
SFX R   niet        nme        niet
SFX R   diet        dme        diet
SFX R   tiet        tme        tiet
SFX R   niet        nte        niet
SFX R   diet        dte        diet
SFX R   tiet        tte        tiet
SFX R   iet         im         iet
SFX R   iet         is         iet
SFX R   iet         i          iet
SFX R   iet         ime        iet
SFX R   iet         ite        iet
SFX R   iet         ia         iet
SFX R   iet         iac        iet
SFX R   iet         el         iet
SFX R   iet         ela        iet
SFX R   iet         elo        iet
SFX R   iet         eli        iet
SFX R   ast         adiem      last
SFX R   ast         adies      last
SFX R   ast         adie       last
SFX R   ast         adieme     last
SFX R   ast         adiete     last
SFX R   ast         adu        last
SFX R   ast         aduc       last
SFX R   ast         d          last
SFX R   ast         adme       last
SFX R   ast         adte       last
SFX R   st          dol        last
SFX R   st          dla        last
SFX R   st          dlo        last
SFX R   st          dli        last
SFX R   ast         asiem      past
SFX R   ast         asies      past
SFX R   ast         asie       past
SFX R   ast         asieme     past
SFX R   ast         asiete     past
SFX R   ast         asu        past
SFX R   ast         asuc       past
SFX R   ast         s          past
SFX R   ast         asme       past
SFX R   ast         aste       past
SFX R   st          sol        past
SFX R   st          sla        past
SFX R   st          slo        past
SFX R   st          sli        past
SFX R   ast         astiem     [^lp]ast
SFX R   ast         asties     [^lp]ast
SFX R   ast         astie      [^lp]ast
SFX R   ast         astieme    [^lp]ast
SFX R   ast         astiete    [^lp]ast
SFX R   ast         astu       [^lp]ast
SFX R   ast         astuc      [^lp]ast
SFX R   ast         ast        [^lp]ast
SFX R   ast         astme      [^lp]ast
SFX R   ast         astte      [^lp]ast
SFX R   t           tol        [^lp]ast
SFX R   t           tla        [^lp]ast
SFX R   t           tlo        [^lp]ast
SFX R   t           tli        [^lp]ast
SFX R   iast        atiem      miast
SFX R   iast        aties      miast
SFX R   iast        atie       miast
SFX R   iast        atieme     miast
SFX R   iast        atiete     miast
SFX R   iast        atu        miast
SFX R   iast        atuc       miast
SFX R   iast        at         miast
SFX R   iast        atme       miast
SFX R   iast        atte       miast
SFX R   st          tol        miast
SFX R   st          tla        miast
SFX R   st          tlo        miast
SFX R   st          tli        miast
SFX R   iast        adiem      priast
SFX R   iast        adies      priast
SFX R   iast        adie       priast
SFX R   iast        adieme     priast
SFX R   iast        adiete     priast
SFX R   iast        adu        priast
SFX R   iast        aduc       priast
SFX R   iast        ad         priast
SFX R   iast        adme       priast
