output.dic
bezat/NR
blacat/NR
blahat/NR
blcat/NR
blystat/NR
boliet/NR
brat/NR
brncat/NR
brniet/NR
bucat/NR
bzucat/NR
civiet/NR
crcat/NR
cvendzat/NR
cipcat/NR
cupiet/NR
curcat/NR
cusat/NR
dobrat/NR
dodrat/NR
dodrzat/NR
dohoriet/NR
dohrcat/NR
dohrmiet/NR
dohrnut/NR
dohryzt/NR
dojest/NR
dojst/NR
dokricat/NR
dokrucat/NR
doletiet/NR
doliezt/NR
domliet/NR
domoct/NR
domrziet/NR
domysliet/NR
doniest/NR
dopiect/NR
dopliest/NR
dopomoct/NR
dorast/NR
doriect/NR
dospat/NR
dosviedcat/NR
dotiect/NR
dotlct/NR
dotrpiet/NR
dovidiet/NR
doviest/NR
doviezt/NR
dovliect/NR
dovraviet/NR
dozvediet/NR
dozrat/NR
drat/NR
drncat/NR
drzat/NR
ducat/NR
duniet/NR
dychcat/NR
ficat/NR
frcat/NR
fucat/NR
funat/NR
funiet/NR
gaucat/NR
hladiet/NR
horiet/NR
hrcat/NR
hrmiet/NR
hryzt/NR
hust/NR
hvizdat/NR
chrapcat/NR
chrapstat/NR
chrcat/NR
chrupcat/NR
ist/R
jacat/NR
jest/NR
jojcat/NR
klast/NR
knucat/NR
kricat/NR
kvocat/NR
kynut/NR
kypiet/NR
letiet/NR
liezt/NR
minut/NR
mliet/NR
moct/NR
mrncat/NR
musiet/NR
nabrat/NR
nadletiet/NR
nadpriast/NR
nahladiet/NR
najst/NR
nakricat/NR
nalezat/NR
naliezt/NR
namysliet/NR
naondiet/NR
napiect/NR
napomoct/NR
napucat/NR
nasediet/NR
natiect/NR
natriast/NR
naviezt/NR
navliect/NR
nazrat/NR
niest/NR
obdrzat/NR
obist/NR
obklast/NR
oblezat/NR
oborat/NR
obrat/NR
obtlct/NR
obzrat/NR
odhrmiet/NR
odjest/NR
odlezat/NR
odmysliet/NR
odobrat/NR
odpocinut/NR
odrast/NR
odriect/NR
odtiect/NR
odviezt/NR
odvliect/NR
ohoriet/NR
omliet/NR
opiect/NR
opriast/NR
orat/NR
otlct/NR
ovinut/NR
panstiet/NR
piect/NR
pliest/NRX
pobrat/NR
podletiet/NR
podmliet/NR
podobrat/NR
podrast/NR
podriect/NR
podtiect/NR
podvliect/NR
pohoriet/NR
pojst/NR
pokynut/NR
pomiast/NR
pomlcat/NR
pomoct/NR
poorat/NR
poprsat/NR
posediet/NR
posrat/ENR
posinut/NR
potlct/NR
potrpiet/NR
povraviet/NR
povzniest/NR
prastat/NR
prdiet/NR
prebrat/NR
predniest/NR
predrzat/NR
prefrcat/NR
prehrmiet/NR
prejst/NR
prekypiet/NR
prelezat/NR
premlcat/NR
premoct/NR
preniest/NR
preorat/NR
prepiect/NR
prerast/NR
presediet/NR
pretiect/NR
pretriast/NR
previest/NR
previnut/NR
prevraviet/NR
prezvediet/NR
priast/NR
pridrzat/NR
priletiet/NR
primusiet/NR
prinalezat/NR
priorat/NR
pripomenut/NR
pririect/NR
pritiect/NR
priviest/NR
privinut/NR
privraviet/NR
pucat/NR
rast/NR
rincat/NR
rozdrat/NR
rozhoriet/NR
rozhryzt/NR
rozist/NR
rozkricat/NR
rozlezat/NR
rozmiest/NR
rozmoct/NR
rozniest/NR
rozodrat/NR
rozorat/NR
rozozrat/NR
rozpomenut/NR
rozprsat/NR
rozrast/NR
rozsumiet/NR
roztlct/NR
rozviest/NR
rozvinut/NR
rozvraviet/NR
rozzvucat/NR
rucat/NR
sediet/NR
schrapstat/NR
skricat/NR
skucat/NR
smrdiet/NR
spistat/NR
spocinut/NR
spomoct/NR
sprat/NR
srat/NR
stiect/NR
striast/NR
strpiet/NR
svedcat/NR
svrbiet/NR
sinut/NR
skrecat/NR
stat/NR
supiet/NR
tiect/NR
trcat/NR
triast/NR
udrzat/NR
ujst/NR
ulezat/NR
uniest/NR
upomenut/NR
uspat/NR
utiect/NR
utrpiet/NR
uviest/NR
uzniest/NR
vdrat/NR
vidiet/NR
viezt/NR
visiet/NR
vliect/NR
vmiest/NR
vniest/NR
vojst/NR
vovliect/NR
vrast/NR
vrcat/NR
vrndzat/NR
vrzdat/NR
vtlct/NR
vydrat/NR
vyfucat/NR
vyhrmiet/NR
vyjest/NR
vyklast/NR
vykypiet/NR
vylezat/NR
vymiest/NR
vymoct/NR
vynajst/NR
vyorat/NR
vypiect/NR
vypomoct/NR
vypriast/NR
vypucat/NR
vyriect/NR
vyslysat/NR
vysrat/NR
vysumiet/NR
vytriast/NR
vyviest/NR
vyvinut/NR
vyvraviet/NR
vyzvediet/NR
vzist/NR
vzmoct/NR
vzrast/NR
zablacat/NR
zaboliet/NR
zabucat/NR
zacvendzat/NR
zadrzat/NR
zadychcat/NR
zaficat/NR
zahladiet/NR
zahrcat/NR
zahucat/NR
zahvizdat/NR
zachrcat/NR
zachrupcat/NR
zajacat/NR
zajojcat/NR
zaknucat/NR
zakvicat/NR
zalezat/NR
zamecat/NR
zamlcat/NR
zamraucat/NR
zamrncat/NR
zamysliet/NR
zaobist/NR
zaorat/NR
zapistat/NR
zaprastat/NR
zapucat/NR
zarapcat/NR
zariect/NR
zarucat/NR
zasediet/NR
zasmazit/NR
zaspat/NR
zasvrbiet/NR
zaskrecat/NR
zaskvrcat/NR
zatiect/NR
zatmiet/NR
zavidiet/NR
zaviezt/NR
zavisiet/NR
zavraviet/NR
zavrestat/NR
zavrzdat/NR
zblcat/NR
zdrzat/NR
zhrcat/NR
zhryzt/NR
zjacat/NR
zjojcat/NR
zliezt/NR
zmiest/NR
zmoct/NR
znenavidiet/NR
zniest/NR
zobrat/NR
zomliet/NR
zosmrdiet/NR
zozrat/NR
zriect/NR
zrucat/NR
zurcat/NR
zvidiet/NR
zvinut/NR
zvrestat/NR
zrat/NR
